Massachusetts, session 194th, H2972.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 3 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the most 
recent edition, is hereby amended in subparagraph (g), under “Group 2”, by inserting after the 
words "wayward children and employees of the Cushing Hospital", the following words:  
“Employees of the Massachusetts Department of Correction whose positions are 
classified in Unit 9, whose regular duties include overseeing, managing, inspecting, or directing 
construction, maintenance, repair, or other operational projects within correctional facilities.”  
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.